lexica/pronouns_overrides.lexc
LEXICON KajEnding

+Sing+Nom:kaj #;
+Sing+Gen:česa #;
+Sing+Dat:čemu #;
+Sing+Acc:kaj #;
+Sing+Loc:čem #;
+Sing+Ins:čim #;

LEXICON Pronoun

kdo+Pronoun+Interrogative+NoPerson+Masc: KdoEnding;
kdovekdo+Pronoun+IndefinitePronoun+NoPerson+Masc:kdove KdoEnding;
malokdo+Pronoun+IndefinitePronoun+NoPerson+Masc:malo KdoEnding;
marsikdo+Pronoun+IndefinitePronoun+NoPerson+Masc:marsi KdoEnding;
mnogokdo+Pronoun+IndefinitePronoun+NoPerson+Masc:mnogo KdoEnding;
nekdo+Pronoun+IndefinitePronoun+NoPerson+Masc:ne KdoEnding;
prenekdo+Pronoun+IndefinitePronoun+NoPerson+Masc:prene KdoEnding;
redkokdo+Pronoun+IndefinitePronoun+NoPerson+Masc:redko KdoEnding;
nikdo+Pronoun+NegativePronoun+NoPerson+Masc:ni KdoEnding;
nobeden+Pronoun+NegativePronoun+NoPerson+Masc+Sing+Nom:nobeden #;

nihče+Pronoun+NegativePronoun+NoPerson+Masc+Sing+Nom:nihče #;
nihče+Pronoun+NegativePronoun+NoPerson+Masc+Sing+Gen:nikogar #;
nihče+Pronoun+NegativePronoun+NoPerson+Masc+Sing+Dat:nikomur #;
nihče+Pronoun+NegativePronoun+NoPerson+Masc+Sing+Acc:nikogar #;
nihče+Pronoun+NegativePronoun+NoPerson+Masc+Sing+Loc:nikomer #;
nihče+Pronoun+NegativePronoun+NoPerson+Masc+Sing+Ins:nikomer #;

nič+Pronoun+NegativePronoun+NoPerson+Neut+Sing+Nom:nič #;
nič+Pronoun+NegativePronoun+NoPerson+Neut+Sing+Gen:ničesar #;
nič+Pronoun+NegativePronoun+NoPerson+Neut+Sing+Dat:ničemur #;
nič+Pronoun+NegativePronoun+NoPerson+Neut+Sing+Acc:nič #;
nič+Pronoun+NegativePronoun+NoPerson+Neut+Sing+Loc:ničemer #;
nič+Pronoun+NegativePronoun+NoPerson+Neut+Sing+Ins:ničimer #;

vsakdo+Pronoun+General+NoPerson+Masc+Sing+Nom:vsakdo #;
vsakdo+Pronoun+General+NoPerson+Masc+Sing+Gen:vsakogar #;
vsakdo+Pronoun+General+NoPerson+Masc+Sing+Dat:vsakomur #;
vsakdo+Pronoun+General+NoPerson+Masc+Sing+Acc:vsakogar #;
vsakdo+Pronoun+General+NoPerson+Masc+Sing+Loc:vsakomer #;
vsakdo+Pronoun+General+NoPerson+Masc+Sing+Ins:vsakomer #;

LEXICON KdoEnding

+Sing+Nom:kdo #;
+Sing+Gen:koga #;
+Sing+Dat:komu #;
+Sing+Acc:koga #;
+Sing+Loc:kom #;
+Sing+Ins:kom #;

LEXICON Pronoun
kaj+Pronoun+Interrogative+NoPerson+Neut: KajEnding;
bogvedikaj+Pronoun+IndefinitePronoun+NoPerson+Neut:bogvedi KajEnding;
bogvekaj+Pronoun+IndefinitePronoun+NoPerson+Neut:bogve KajEnding;
kdovekaj+Pronoun+IndefinitePronoun+NoPerson+Neut:kdove KajEnding;
malokaj+Pronoun+IndefinitePronoun+NoPerson+Neut:malo KajEnding;
marsikaj+Pronoun+IndefinitePronoun+NoPerson+Neut:marsi KajEnding;
mnogokaj+Pronoun+IndefinitePronoun+NoPerson+Neut:mnogo KajEnding;
prenekaj+Pronoun+IndefinitePronoun+NoPerson+Neut:prene KajEnding;
nekaj+Pronoun+IndefinitePronoun+NoPerson+Neut:ne KajEnding;
